ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/sv_SE/hyph_sv_SE.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.ä2
.ä2g2g
.äg9gu1la/gg=,2,1
.bus9stationen/ss=,3,1
.1bu
.buss1t
.bussta3ti
.busstatio1ne
.f2
.ful9laddad/ll=,3,1
.1fu
.ful1la
.fulla2dd
.fullad1da
.ful9längdaren/ll=,3,1
.full1ä
.fullän2gd
.fulläng1da
.fullängda1re
.ful9längdsdebut/ll=,3,1
.fulläng2ds
.fullängd2s1d2
.fullängds1de
.fullängdsde1b
.fullängdsde1bu
.ful9lödi1ga/ll=,3,1
.ful1lö
.ful2löd
.fullö1di
.ful9lödi2gt/ll=,3,1
.g2
.grup9psykolo1gi/pp=,4,1
.grupp1s
.gru2pp
.grupp1sy
.gruppsy1ko
.gruppsyko1lo
.k2
.klas9sa2m/ss=,4,1
.klas3sa
.klas9skillnad/ss=,4,1
.klasskill1na
.klas9son/ss=,4,1
.klas1so
.kontrol9läsas/ll=,7,1
.kon1tr
.kontrol1lä
.kontrollä1sa
.kros9skador/ss=,4,1
.kr2
.kr2oss
.krosska1do
.mas9slakt/ss=,3,1
.1ma
.mass1l
.mass2lak
.mis9sköter/ss=,3,1
.1mis
.mis2skö
.misskö1te
.mis9skö2ts/ss=,3,1
.mis9skött/ss=,3,1
.n2
.nat9tåg/tt=,3,1
.1na
.natt1å
.nat9taxa/tt=,3,1
.nat1ta
.nat1tax1
.1nat9tjänster3na/tt=,3,1
.nat3tjän
.nattjäns1te
.o2
.oup9packa1de/pp=,3,1
.ou2pp
.oup2pac
.oup1pa
.ouppa2ck
.ouppack1ad
.p2
.plat9tång/tt=,4,1
.platt1å
.pot9träningen/tt=,3,1
.potträ1ni
.pottränin2g1e
.s2
.straf9förelägganden/ff=,5,1
.st2raf
.st2ra2ff
.straf1fö
.straffö1re
.strafför2e1lä
.strafförelä2gg
.strafföreläg1ga
.strafföreläggan1de
.straf9fri1het/ff=,5,1
.straff1r
.straff2ri1h
.straffri1he
.t2
.til9läget/ll=,3,1
.1ti
.til2l
.tillä1ge
.til9lä2gg/ll=,3,1
.til9läm1pa/ll=,3,1
.til9lämpbart/ll=,3,1
.tillämp1b
.tillämp1ba
.til9lämp1lig/ll=,3,1
.tillämp1l
.til9lämpning/ll=,3,1
.tillämp1n
.tillämp1ni
.til9lät/ll=,3,1
.til9li1ka/ll=,3,1
.til1li
.til2lik
.til9lit/ll=,3,1
.top9placering/pp=,3,1
.to2pp
.topp1l
.toppla1ce
.topplace1ri
.tug9gummi/gg=,3,1
.tu2gg
.tuggum1m
.u2
.up9packa1de/pp=,2,1
.u2pp
.up2pac
.up1pa
.uppa2ck
.uppack1ad
.up9packning/pp=,2,1
.uppack1ni
.up9piggad/pp=,2,1
.up2pig
.up1pi
.uppi2gg
.uppig1ga
.up9piggan1de/pp=,2,1
.äg9get2s./gg=,2,1
.äg1ge
.ägge2t2s
.äg9gulan./gg=,2,1
.äg9gulor./gg=,2,1
.äggu2lo
.balet9trupp./tt=,5,1
.1ba
.ba1le
.balettru2pp
.balet9truppen./tt=,5,1
.balettrup1pe
.balet9truppen2s./tt=,5,1
.balettrup1pens
.balet9trupper./tt=,5,1
.balet9truppern2a./tt=,5,1
.balettrupper3na
.blanket9tryc2k./tt=,7,1
.blan1ke
.blanket1try
.blankettry2ck
.blanket9trycke2t./tt=,7,1
.blankettryck1e
.blanket9trycket2s./tt=,7,1
.blankettrycke2t2s
.blanket9tryckpres2s./tt=,7,1
.blankettryck1p
.bor9rig2g./rr=,3,1
.bor1ri
.borri2gg
.bor9riggar./rr=,3,1
.borrig1ga
.bor9riggar2s./rr=,3,1
.bor9riggen./rr=,3,1
.borrig1ge
.bor9riggen2s./rr=,3,1
.bor9rigg2s./rr=,3,1
.brun9n2a./nn=,4,1
.brun1na
.brun9nar./nn=,4,1
.brun9narn2a./nn=,4,1
.brun1nar1na
.brun9narna2s./nn=,4,1
.brun9nar2s./nn=,4,1
.brun9nen./nn=,4,1
.brun1ne
.brun9nen2s./nn=,4,1
.brun9ne2t./nn=,4,1
.bus9station./ss=,3,1
.bus9stationer./ss=,3,1
.bus9stationern2a./ss=,3,1
.busstationer3na
.bus9stationerna2s./ss=,3,1
.busstatio4n3ernas
.bus9stationer2s./ss=,3,1
.bus9station2s./ss=,3,1
.busstation2s1
.d2
.dam9moln./mm=,3,1
.1da
.dam1m
.dam1mo
.dam9molnen./mm=,3,1
.dammol1ne
.dam9molnen2s./mm=,3,1
.dam9molne2t./mm=,3,1
.dam9molnet2s./mm=,3,1
.dammolne2t2s
.dam9moln2s./mm=,3,1
.dam9muss1l2a./mm=,3,1
.dam2mu
.dam1mus
.dammuss1l
.dam9musslan./mm=,3,1
.dam9musslor./mm=,3,1
.dammuss1lor
.dar9rock2a./rr=,3,1
.dar1ro
.darro2ck
.dar9rockan./rr=,3,1
.darrock1an
.dar9rockan2s./rr=,3,1
.falset9ton./tt=,6,1
.1fa
.fal3set
.fal1se
.falset1to
.falset1ton
.flageolet9ton./tt=,9,1
.fla1ge
.flageo1le
.flageolet1to
.flageolet1ton
.glas9stru2t./ss=,4,1
.his9schak2t./ss=,3,1
.hiss1c
.hissc2h
.hotel9lednin2g./ll=,5,1
.1hot
.ho1te
.hotel1le
.hotel1led
.hotelled1n
.hotelled1ni
.kal2la2
.kal9la2d./ll=,3,1
.3kal2l3ad
.kal9lad2e./ll=,3,1
.kalla1de
.kal9lade2s./ll=,3,1
.kallad3es
.kal9lan./ll=,3,1
.kal9land2e./ll=,3,1
.kallan1de
.kal9lan2s./ll=,3,1
.kall3ar./ll=,3,1
.kal9lar4e./ll=,3,1
.kalla3re
.kal9la2s./ll=,3,1
.kal9la2s4t./ll=,3,1
.kal9last2e./ll=,3,1
.kallas1te
.kal9la2t./ll=,3,1
.kal9lat2s./ll=,3,1
.kal2la2ts
.kat9tor./tt=,3,1
.kat1to
.kat9torn2a./tt=,3,1
.kattor1na
.kat9torna2s./tt=,3,1
.kat9tor2s./tt=,3,1
.klas9skiljand2e./ss=,4,1
.klasskil1ja
.klasskiljan1de
.klas9solidarite2t./ss=,4,1
.klas1so1li
.klassoli1da
.klassolida1ri
.klassolidari1te
.klas9solidariteten./ss=,4,1
.klassolidarite1te
.klas9storle2k./ss=,4,1
.klasstor1le
.klas9stri2d./ss=,4,1
.klas9stry2k./ss=,4,1
.kompas9strec2k./ss=,6,1
.kom1p
.kom1pa
.kompasstre2ck
.kompas9styrnin2g./ss=,6,1
.kompas3styr
.kompasstyr1ni
.kontrol9lamp2a./ll=,7,1
.kontrol1la
.kontrollam1pa
.kontrol9lampor./ll=,7,1
.kontrollam1po
.marionet9teater./tt=,8,1
.ma1ri
.mari1on
.marionet2
.mario1ne
.marionet1te
.marionette1at
.marionet1tea1te2
.marionet9teatern./tt=,8,1
.marionet9ten2s./tt=,8,1
.marionet9ter./tt=,8,1
.marionet9tern2a./tt=,8,1
.marionetter3na
.marionet9terna2s./tt=,8,1
.marionet9ter2s./tt=,8,1
.mäs2s
.mäs9san./ss=,3,1
.1mäs1
.mäs1sa
.mäs9san2s./ss=,3,1
.mäs9singen./ss=,3,1
.mäs2sin
.mäs1si
.mässin2g1e
.mäs9singsban2d./ss=,3,1
.mässings1b
.mässings1ba
.mäs9singskläd3d2a./ss=,3,1
.mässings1k
.mässings1kl
.mässingsk2läd
.mässingsklä2dd
.mässingskläd1da
.mäs9singsmekanis2m./ss=,3,1
.mässings1m
.mässings1me
.mässingsme1ka
.mässingsme1ka1ni
.mas9spektrogra2f./ss=,3,1
.mass2p
.masspek1tro
.masspektro1gr
.mas9spektru2m./ss=,3,1
.masspek1tru
.mas9suggestion./ss=,3,1
.mass1u
.mas1s2ug
.massu2gg
.massug1ge
.massugges1ti
.måt9tad2e./tt=,3,1
.må2t2
.måt1ta
.måtta1de
.måt9ten./tt=,3,1
.måt1te
.måt9te2t./tt=,3,1
.mat9tra1sor./tt=,3,1
.matt1ra
.mattra1so
.metal9ledar4e./ll=,5,1
.1me
.me1ta
.metal2l
.metal1le
.metal1led
.metalle1da
.metalleda1re
.metal9legerin2g./ll=,5,1
.metalle1g
.metallege2
.metalle1ger
.metallege1r1i
.metal9legeringar./ll=,5,1
.metallegerin2g1a
.metal9len2s./ll=,5,1
.metal9lern2a./ll=,5,1
.metaller3na
.metal9lerna2s./ll=,5,1
.metal9ler2s./ll=,5,1
.mös2
.mös9san./ss=,3,1
.mös1sa
.mös9sor./ss=,3,1
.mös2so
.nat9taxor./tt=,3,1
.nat9trafi2k./tt=,3,1
.natt1ra
.natt2raf
.nattra1fi
.nat9trafiken./tt=,3,1
.nattrafi1ke
.nat9trafiken2s./tt=,3,1
.nedbrun9n2a./nn=,7,1
.1ne
.ned1b
.nedbrun1na
.nedbrun9nen./nn=,7,1
.1nedbrun1ne
.nerbrun9nen./nn=,7,1
.ner1b
.nerbrun1ne
.nyvun9nen./nn=,5,1
.ny1vu
.nyvun2
.nyvun1ne
.oup9packa2d./pp=,3,1
.oup9packa2t./pp=,3,1
.ouppack1at
.pal9lyftar4e./ll=,3,1
.1pa
.pal1ly
.pally2ft
.pallyf1ta
.pallyfta1re
.parallel9lindnin2g./ll=,8,1
.pa1ra
.para2l
.paral1le
.parallel3li
.parallellind1n
.parallellind1ni
.parallel9linj2e./ll=,8,1
.parallellin1je
.plat9tryck2t./tt=,4,1
.plat1try
.plattry2ck
.plat9ty2s2k./tt=,4,1
.plat1ty
.plat9tys1k2a./tt=,4,1
.plat9tyskan./tt=,4,1
.porträt9terad2e./tt=,7,1
.por2tr
.por3trät2
.porträt1te
.porträtte1ra
.porträttera1de
.porträt9terar./tt=,7,1
.porträt9tera2s./tt=,7,1
.porträt9tera2t./tt=,7,1
.pres9saf2t./ss=,4,1
.pres1sa
.pres2saf
.pressa2ft
.pres9saften./ss=,4,1
.pressaf1te
.pres9safter./ss=,4,1
.pres4se
.pres9sekreterar4e./ss=,4,1
.pres2se1kr2
.pressekre1te
.pressekrete1ra
.pressekrete1ra1re
.pres9sekreteraren./ss=,4,1
.pres9sen./ss=,4,1
.pres9sen2s./ss=,4,1
.pres9ser2i./ss=,4,1
.presse3ri
.pres9stopp./ss=,4,1
.pressto2pp
.pres9stoppen./ss=,4,1
.presstop3pe
.pres9stoppen2s./ss=,4,1
.presstop1pens
.pres9stoppe2t./ss=,4,1
.pres9stoppet2s./ss=,4,1
.presstoppe2t2s
.pres9stopp2s./ss=,4,1
.pres9syl1t2a./ss=,4,1
.pres1sy
.pressyl1ta
.pres9syltan./ss=,4,1
.pres9syltan2s./ss=,4,1
.pres9syltor./ss=,4,1
.proces9styrnin2g./ss=,6,1
.pro1ce
.proces3styr
.processtyr1ni
.r2
.rebel9ledar4e./ll=,5,1
.re1b
.re1bel2
.rebel1le
.rebel1led
.rebelle1da
.rebelleda1re
.rebel9ledaren./ll=,5,1
.rebel9len./ll=,5,1
.rebel9len2s./ll=,5,1
.rebel9ler./ll=,5,1
.rebel9ler2a./ll=,5,1
.rebelle1ra
.rebel9lerad2e./ll=,5,1
.rebellera1de
.rebel9lerar./ll=,5,1
.rebel9lera2t./ll=,5,1
.rebel9lern2a./ll=,5,1
.rebeller3na
.rebel9lerna2s./ll=,5,1
.rebel9ler2s./ll=,5,1
.remis9skrivels2e./ss=,5,1
.re1mi
.re1mis
.remisskr2
.remisskri1ve
.remisskri1vel1
.remisskrivel1se
.remis9svar./ss=,5,1
.remis9svaren./ss=,5,1
.remissva1re
.remis9svaren2s./ss=,5,1
.remis9svare2t./ss=,5,1
.remis9svaret2s./ss=,5,1
.remissvare2t2s
.remis9svar2s./ss=,5,1
.rul2
.rul9la2d./ll=,3,1
.rul1la
.rul9lad2e./ll=,3,1
.rulla1de
.rul9lade2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9lager./ll=,3,1
.rulla1ge
.rul9lagra2d./ll=,3,1
.rullag1ra
.rullag1rad
.rul9lagren./ll=,3,1
.rullag1re
.rul9lagre2t./ll=,3,1
.rul9lan./ll=,3,1
.rul9land2e./ll=,3,1
.rullan1de
.rul9lan2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9lar./ll=,3,1
.rul9lar4e./ll=,3,1
.rulla3re
.rul9larn2a./ll=,3,1
.rullar1na
.rul9larna2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9lar2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9la2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9la2t./ll=,3,1
.rul9lator./ll=,3,1
.rulla1to
.rul9lato1rer./ll=,3,1
.rullato1re
.rul9latorern2a./ll=,3,1
.rullato1rern
.rullatorer3na
.rul9latorerna2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9latorer2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9latorn./ll=,3,1
.rul9latorn2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9lator2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9lat2s./ll=,3,1
.rulla2ts
.rul9len./ll=,3,1
.rul1le
.rul9len2s./ll=,3,1
.rul9le2s./ll=,3,1
.rul3les
.sagoomspun9nen./nn=,10,1
.1sa
.sa1go
.sa1g2oo
.sagoo2ms
.sagoom1s2pu
.sagoomspun1ne
.silhuet9tecknin2g./tt=,7,1
.1si
.sil1h
.sil1hu
.silhu1e
.silhuet1te
.silhuet3tec
.silhuette2ck
.silhuetteck1ni
.silhuet9teckningen./tt=,7,1
.silhuettecknin2g1e
.sil9lak2e./ll=,3,1
.sil1la
.sil3lak
.silla1ke
.sil9laken./ll=,3,1
.sil9lar./ll=,3,1
.sil9larn2a./ll=,3,1
.sillar1na
.sil9larna2s./ll=,3,1
.sil9lar2s./ll=,3,1
.siluet9tecknin2g./tt=,6,1
.silu1e
.siluet1te
.siluet3tec
.siluette2ck
.siluetteck1ni
.siluet9teckningen./tt=,6,1
.siluettecknin2g1e
.skot9tavl2a./tt=,4,1
.skot1ta
.skotta2v1l
.skot9tavlan./tt=,4,1
.skot9tavlan2s./tt=,4,1
.skot9tavlor./tt=,4,1
.skot9tavlorn2a./tt=,4,1
.skottavlor1na
.skot9tavlor2s./tt=,4,1
.snab9b2e./bb=,4,1
.s1na
.sna2bb
.snab1be2
.snab9behandl2a./bb=,4,1
.snabbe1h
.snabbehand1l
.snabbehand3la
.snab9behandlad2e./bb=,4,1
.snabbehandla1de
.snab9behandlin2g./bb=,4,1
.snab9behandlingsutrustnin2g./bb=,4,1
.snabbehandlings1ut
.snabbehandlingsut1r
.snabbehandlingsutrus2t1n
.snabbehandlingsutrust1ni
.snab9blic2k./bb=,4,1
.snabb1l
.snabbli2ck
.snab9bus2s./bb=,4,1
.snab1bu
.snab9bussar./bb=,4,1
.snabbus1sa
.snab9bussen./bb=,4,1
.snabbus1se
.snab9bussen2s./bb=,4,1
.snäl9lar4e./ll=,4,1
.snäl2
.snäl1la
.snälla3re
.snäl9last2e./ll=,4,1
.snällas1te
.stal9lyk1t2a./ll=,4,1
.stal1ly
.stallyk1ta
.stop9plik2t./pp=,4,1
.sto2pp
.stopp1l
.stop9pri2s./pp=,4,1
.stop1p1r
.stop1pris
.stop9prise2t./pp=,4,1
.stoppri1se
.straf9for2m./ff=,5,1
.straf1fo
.straf9fr2i./ff=,5,1
.straf9fri2a./ff=,5,1
.straf9frit2t./ff=,5,1
.stres9sig2a./ss=,5,1
.stres2s2ig
.stres1si
.stressi1ga
.stres9sig2t./ss=,5,1
.stressi2gt
.stres9situation./ss=,5,1
.stressi1tu
.stressitu1a
.stressitua3ti
.stres9situationen./ss=,5,1
.stressituatio1ne
.stres9situationen2s./ss=,5,1
.stres9situationer./ss=,5,1
.stres9situationern2a./ss=,5,1
.stressituationer3na
.stres9situationerna2s./ss=,5,1
.stressituatio4n3ernas
.stres9situationer2s./ss=,5,1
.stres9situation2s./ss=,5,1
.stressituation2s1
.tablet9torken./tt=,6,1
.ta1bl
.tablet1to
.tablettor1ke
.til9lad2e./ll=,3,1
.til1la
.tilla1de
.til9lade2s./ll=,3,1
.til9lag2a./ll=,3,1
.tilla1ga
.til9laga2d./ll=,3,1
.til9lagad2e./ll=,3,1
.tillaga1de
.til9lagade2s./ll=,3,1
.til9lagar./ll=,3,1
.til9laga2s./ll=,3,1
.til9laga2t./ll=,3,1
.til9lagat2s./ll=,3,1
.tillaga2ts
.til9lag2d./ll=,3,1
.tilla2gd
.til9lag3d2a./ll=,3,1
.tillag1da
.til9lagnin2g./ll=,3,1
.tillag1ni
.til9lagningen./ll=,3,1
.tillagnin2g1e
.til9lagningstemperatu1rer./ll=,3,1
.tillagnings3tem
.tillagnings1te
.tillagningstem1pe
.tillagningstempe1ra
.tillagningstempera1tu
